Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-159.01
New title of vehicle previously issued title as assembled vehicle; fee.

For each certificate of title issued by the department under section 60-142.06, the fee shall be twenty-five dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 18.